North Carolina, session 2025, HB1046.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 10 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-434.02. Biennial report on economic opportunity, affordability, and family
economic security.
(a) Report. – The Department of Commerce shall prepare and publish a biennial report
on economic opportunity, affordability, and family economic security in North Carolina.
(b) Purpose. – The report required by this section shall supplement traditional measures
of economic activity by providing the General Assembly and the public with information on
statewide and county-level economic conditions affecting individuals, families, and
communities.
(c) Data. – The report shall include data for the State and, to the extent practicable, for
each county. In preparing the report, the Department shall use existing federal, State, and other
publicly available data to the maximum extent practicable and may consult with institutions of
higher education, research organizations, and other relevant entities.
(d) Required Metrics. – At a minimum, the report shall include all of the following:
(1) Hardship indicators, including the poverty rate, child poverty, deep poverty,
and the supplemental poverty rate, if available at the relevant level of analysis.
(2) Work and earnings indicators, including labor force participation,
employment, unemployment, the share of jobs that pay wages sufficient to
meet basic household needs, and the share of jobs that provide
employer-sponsored health insurance or other commonly available
employment benefits, to the extent that data is available.
(3) Household affordability indicators, including the share of household income
spent on housing, food, child care, and health care, including premiums and
other major out-of-pocket costs to the extent that data is available.
(4) Cost-burden indicators, including the percentage of households that are
cost-burdened with respect to housing, child care, and health care costs, to the
extent that data is available.
*H1046-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) Education and workforce preparation indicators, including the cost of
postsecondary education relative to income and the cost of workforce training
and credentialing programs relative to income, to the extent practicable.
(6) Community and regional opportunity indicators, including persistent poverty
counties or census tracts, concentrated poverty census tracts, and the number
of people living in areas of persistent or concentrated poverty.
(7) Other county-level indicators of economic opportunity, business formation, or
workforce access that the Department determines are appropriate and
supported by reliable public data.
(e) Methodology. – Each report shall identify the data sources used, describe the
methodology applied, and note any material limitations affecting interpretation of the report.
(f) Submission. – The Department shall submit the report required by this section to the
Joint Legislative Economic Development and Global Engagement Oversight Committee, the
Fiscal Research Division, and the General Assembly no later than January 31 of each
odd-numbered year. The Department shall also publish the report on its website."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Commerce the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) in recurring funds beginning in
the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to implement this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 1046-First Edition